Nevada, session 83, AB380.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 433.704 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.704 1. The Division shall support the implementation of
a hotline for persons who are considering suicide or otherwise in a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
behavioral health crisis that may be accessed by dialing the digits 9-
8-8 by:
(a) Establishing at least one support center that meets the
requirements of NRS 433.706 to answer calls to the hotline and
coordinate the response to persons who access the hotline;
(b) Encouraging the establishment of and, to the extent that
money is available, establishing mobile crisis teams to provide
community-based intervention, including, without limitation, de-
escalation and stabilization, for persons who are considering suicide
or otherwise in a behavioral health crisis and access the hotline;
(c) Participating in any collection of information by the Federal
Government concerning the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline
program;
(d) Collaborating with the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline
program and the Veterans Crisis Line program established pursuant
to 38 U.S.C. § 1720F(h) to ensure consistent messaging to the
public about the hotline;
(e) Supporting the provision of crisis stabilization services at
hospitals that hold endorsements as crisis stabilization centers
pursuant to NRS 449.0915; and
(f) Adopting any regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of NRS 433.702 to 433.710, inclusive, including, without
limitation:
(1) Regulations establishing the qualifications of providers of
services who are involved in responding to persons who are
considering suicide or are otherwise in a behavioral health crisis and
access the hotline;
(2) Any regulations necessary to allow for communication
and sharing of information between persons and entities involved in
responding to crises and emergencies in this State to facilitate the
coordination of care for persons who are considering suicide or are
otherwise in a behavioral health crisis and access the hotline; and
(3) Regulations defining the term “person professionally
qualified in the field of behavioral health” for the purposes of this
section.
2. A mobile crisis team established pursuant to paragraph (b)
of subsection 1 must [be:
(a) A team based in the jurisdiction that it serves which includes
persons professionally qualified in the field of behavioral health and
providers of peer recovery support services;
(b) A team established by a provider of emergency medical
services that includes persons professionally qualified in the field of
behavioral health and providers of peer recovery support services; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(c) A team established by a law enforcement agency that
includes law enforcement officers, persons professionally qualified
in the field of psychiatric mental health and providers of peer
recovery support services.] consist of:
(a) One or more persons professionally qualified in the field of
behavioral health; and
(b) One or more:
(1) Law enforcement officers;
(2) Providers of emergency medical services; or
(3) Persons with appropriate expertise in the field of
behavioral health, which may include, without limitation, a
community health worker, a provider of case management
services, a provider of peer recovery support services or a similar
paraprofessional.
3. A telecommunications provider and its employees, agents,
subcontractors and suppliers are not liable for damages that directly
or indirectly result from the installation, maintenance or provision of
service in relation to the hotline implemented pursuant to this
section, including, without limitation, the total or partial failure of
any transmission to a support center, unless willful conduct or gross
negligence is proven.
4. As used in this section [, “peer] :
(a) “Case management services” means medical or other
health care management services to assist patients and providers
of health care, including, without limitation, identifying and
facilitating additional resources and treatments, providing
information about treatment options and facilitating
communication between providers of services to a patient.
(b) “Community health worker” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0027.
(c) “Peer recovery support services” means nonclinical
supportive services that use lived experience in recovery from a
substance use disorder or other behavioral health disorder to
promote recovery in another person with a substance use disorder or
other behavioral health disorder by advocating, mentoring,
educating, offering hope and providing assistance in navigating
systems.
(d) “Provider of emergency medical services” means a person
who is:
(1) Licensed as an attendant or certified as an emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician or
paramedic pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(2) Authorized to practice as an emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic
in this State under the Recognition of Emergency Medical
Services Personnel Licensure Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)